public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ar eràe/P ^roersar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^sajar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^scantiđar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^skortegar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^sotolinear
SFX A ar eràe/P ^soverkiar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^spergoŧar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^sperimentar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^sperlongar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^spernacar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^sperđurar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^steriliđar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^terapienar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^teraŧar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^termenar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^terŧariolar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^tormentar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^verdeđar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^vergiđar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^verifegar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^verolar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^verxurar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xberlefar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xberlotar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xberlumar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xberxelar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xermojar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xgoñar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xlargiđar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xmerejar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xmeriliar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xmerŧiar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xmorgolar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xnervađar
SFX A ar eràe/P ^xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar eràe/P alar
SFX A ar eràe/P amar
SFX A ar eràe/P arar
SFX A ar eràe/P bertonar
SFX A ar eràe/P dar
SFX A ar eràe/P derenar
SFX A ar eràe/P donar
SFX A ar eràe/P far
SFX A ar eràe/P fumar
SFX A ar eràe/P kalar
SFX A ar eràe/P kantar
SFX A ar eràe/P kolar
SFX A ar eràe/P korniđar
SFX A ar eràe/P kurvar
SFX A ar eràe/P lotar
SFX A ar eràe/P lumar
SFX A ar eràe/P menar
SFX A ar eràe/P meravejar
SFX A ar eràe/P međar
SFX A ar eràe/P mojar
SFX A ar eràe/P mudarar
SFX A ar eràe/P ojar
SFX A ar eràe/P okar
SFX A ar eràe/P perdonar
SFX A ar eràe/P perletar
SFX A ar eràe/P pertegar
SFX A ar eràe/P pongar
SFX A ar eràe/P rajar
SFX A ar eràe/P ramar
SFX A ar eràe/P redar
SFX A ar eràe/P rigolar
SFX A ar eràe/P rivar
SFX A ar eràe/P rolar
SFX A ar eràe/P seguitar
SFX A ar eràe/P serajar
SFX A ar eràe/P siar
SFX A ar eràe/P speronar
SFX A ar eràe/P sugar
SFX A ar eràe/P terminar
SFX A ar eràe/P tonar
SFX A ar eràe/P tuar
SFX A ar eràe/P vejar
SFX A ar eràe/P velar
SFX A ar eràe/P vergoñar
SFX A ar eràe/P verigolar
SFX A ar eràe/P versar
SFX A ar eràe/P verđelar
SFX A ar eràe/P xelar
SFX A ar eràe/P xmerdar
SFX A ar eràe/P đurar
SFX A ar eràe/P ŧercar
SFX A ar eràe/P ŧitar
SFX A ar erè/H [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar erè/H [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar erè/H [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar erè/H [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar erè/H [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar erè/H [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar erè/H [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar erè/H [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar erè/H [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar erè/H [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar erè/H [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar erè/H [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar erè/H [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar erè/H [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [abik]rokar
SFX A ar erè/H [abikoptu]riar
SFX A ar erè/H [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar erè/H [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeio]strar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A ar erè/H [aelo]var
SFX A ar erè/H [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeo]liar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar erè/H [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar erè/H [agot]rejar
SFX A ar erè/H [ai]erar
SFX A ar erè/H [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [ail]gar
SFX A ar erè/H [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar erè/H [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar erè/H [ailu]minar
SFX A ar erè/H [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar erè/H [aisu]kiar
SFX A ar erè/H [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar erè/H [als]tar
SFX A ar erè/H [an]deđar
SFX A ar erè/H [an]fraxar
SFX A ar erè/H [an]kuerar
SFX A ar erè/H [an]kuirar
SFX A ar erè/H [ano]fegar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]niđar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]rcar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]rdar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]rkar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]rnar
SFX A ar erè/H [ao]rsar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]nŧiar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]rbar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]rgar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]rkiar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]rlar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]rtar
SFX A ar erè/H [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar erè/H [aux]nar
SFX A ar erè/H [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar erè/H [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar erè/H [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar erè/H [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar erè/H [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdfjmnptvx]iar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar erè/H [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar erè/H [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar erè/H [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar erè/H [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar erè/H [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar erè/H [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar erè/H [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A ar erè/H [bou]rogar
SFX A ar erè/H [bp]erlar
SFX A ar erè/H [btv]ergar
SFX A ar erè/H [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar erè/H [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar erè/H [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar erè/H [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar erè/H [dg]obar
SFX A ar erè/H [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar erè/H [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar erè/H [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar erè/H [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar erè/H [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [eilox]mar
SFX A ar erè/H [einoru]xar
SFX A ar erè/H [einosu]car
SFX A ar erè/H [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar erè/H [eo]liđar
SFX A ar erè/H [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar erè/H [es]kotar
SFX A ar erè/H [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar erè/H [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar erè/H [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar erè/H [fm]eretar
SFX A ar erè/H [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar erè/H [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar erè/H [gin]ritar
SFX A ar erè/H [iln]trar
SFX A ar erè/H [inru]jar
SFX A ar erè/H [io]ntar
SFX A ar erè/H [io]rkolar
SFX A ar erè/H [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar erè/H [ipu]lar
SFX A ar erè/H [irst]umar
SFX A ar erè/H [klt]ivar
SFX A ar erè/H [kp]avejar
SFX A ar erè/H [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A ar erè/H [ln]etrar
SFX A ar erè/H [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar erè/H [mp]eritar
SFX A ar erè/H [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar erè/H [ns]erbar
SFX A ar erè/H [ns]ervar
SFX A ar erè/H [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar erè/H [nsv]edar
SFX A ar erè/H [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar erè/H [op]ar
SFX A ar erè/H [ox]longar
SFX A ar erè/H [pt]resar
SFX A ar erè/H [pt]rotar
SFX A ar erè/H [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar erè/H [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar erè/H [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar erè/H [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar erè/H [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar erè/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar erè/H ^alienar
SFX A ar erè/H ^bersajar
SFX A ar erè/H ^bordeđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^deramar
SFX A ar erè/H ^derivar
SFX A ar erè/H ^derobar
SFX A ar erè/H ^derokar
SFX A ar erè/H ^derotar
SFX A ar erè/H ^desferenŧiar
SFX A ar erè/H ^devorar
SFX A ar erè/H ^devorŧiar
SFX A ar erè/H ^dexeredar
SFX A ar erè/H ^dexverxenar
SFX A ar erè/H ^exerŧitar
SFX A ar erè/H ^fermentar
SFX A ar erè/H ^griliar
SFX A ar erè/H ^guernar
SFX A ar erè/H ^inbaretar
SFX A ar erè/H ^infervorar
SFX A ar erè/H ^inkartonar
SFX A ar erè/H ^intarsiar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interesar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interkalar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interkuerar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interkuirar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interlinear
SFX A ar erè/H ^intermeđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interogar
SFX A ar erè/H ^interpretar
SFX A ar erè/H ^inveriar
SFX A ar erè/H ^inversiar
SFX A ar erè/H ^inŧercelar
SFX A ar erè/H ^kalefar
SFX A ar erè/H ^kriolar
SFX A ar erè/H ^lustrar
SFX A ar erè/H ^maravejar
SFX A ar erè/H ^merkantar
SFX A ar erè/H ^merkantiđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^ormeđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perfumar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perifraxar
SFX A ar erè/H ^periodar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perkolar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perkotar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perlustrar
SFX A ar erè/H ^permudarar
SFX A ar erè/H ^permutar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perorar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perpetrar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perpetuar
SFX A ar erè/H ^perseguitar
SFX A ar erè/H ^personaliđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^persugar
SFX A ar erè/H ^raxar
SFX A ar erè/H ^robar
SFX A ar erè/H ^roersar
SFX A ar erè/H ^sajar
SFX A ar erè/H ^scantiđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^skortegar
SFX A ar erè/H ^sotolinear
SFX A ar erè/H ^soverkiar
SFX A ar erè/H ^spergoŧar
SFX A ar erè/H ^sperimentar
SFX A ar erè/H ^sperlongar
SFX A ar erè/H ^spernacar
SFX A ar erè/H ^sperđurar
SFX A ar erè/H ^steriliđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^terapienar
SFX A ar erè/H ^teraŧar
SFX A ar erè/H ^termenar
SFX A ar erè/H ^terŧariolar
SFX A ar erè/H ^tormentar
SFX A ar erè/H ^verdeđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^vergiđar
SFX A ar erè/H ^verifegar
SFX A ar erè/H ^verolar
