public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
aflíxer/A
albitrar/A
alegrar/A
alŧetar/A
reandar/A
angosiar/A
arborar/A
argomentar/A
arpiar/A
inasiar/A
aŧalar/A
inaugurar/A
axardar/A
avar/A
bagajar/A
xbajafar/A
xbaketar/A
balanŧar/A
inbalinar/A
xbalotar/A
xbalŧar/A
bandonar/A
xbanpolar/A
xbarakar/A
xbarbatolar/A
xbarkar/A
barxeletar/A
bastardar/A
batiđar/A
xbaŧegar/A
bavar/A
xbaxir/A
xbefeđar/A
inbeletar/A
xberlefar/A
betegar/A
xbevakiar/A
xbiankir/A
xbiaxemar/A
binar/A
dexbingolar/A
inbironar/A
bituar/A
blaterar/A
sobójer/A
soboɉir/A
inbokolar/A
xboloñar/A
bonir/A
xbonbardar/A
borir/A
xbordelar/A
bortir/A
inbotir/A
boŧar/A
dexboxemar/A
xbragañar/A
xbraɉar/A
sbrankar/A
braŧar/A
xbregar/A
dexbrigar/A
xbriñar/A
inbrojar/A
inbrokar/A
bronbolar/A
brulegar/A
bruskinar/A
bufar/A
buratar/A
inbustar/A
buxarar/A
dexbuxolar/A
scapar/A
casar/A
cekolar/A
decèñer/A
tracèñer/A
mancéñer/A
precetar/A
cilar/A
incokar/A
incukar/A
interdir/A
danar/A
indebolir/A
indentar/A
derenar/A
devastar/A
prodigar/A
indivinar/A
redíxer/A
doɉiđar/A
radolŧir/A
domiŧiliar/A
indopiar/A
dormir/A
dotar/A
dreŧar/A
dulkorar/A
prededúxer/A
đaltronar/A
inđenocar/A
dexđónxer/A
rinđovenar/A
sperđurar/A
eklisar/A
enpir/A
espèler/A
exímer/A
sorafar/A
falar/A
fameɉar/A
desfasar/A
favorir/A
purifegar/A
fénder/A
proferir/A
dexenfetar/A
sfiankar/A
konfidar/A
refilar/A
fiokar/A
desfisir/A
flosar/A
infogonar/A
fónder/A
deformar/A
forŧar/A
sfrakasar/A
frasar/A
parafraxar/A
fríđer/A
sfronxar/A
refuɉar/A
furfar/A
dexgaɉar/A
ingaluŧar/A
xgarar/A
garofolir/A
ingaxiar/A
godegar/A
gorgeđar/A
xgramolar/A
xgrankir/A
agravar/A
xgrendenar/A
xgriñaŧar/A
xgronŧolar/A
dexguantar/A
xguatarar/A
guxar/A
indavalkar/A
inɉuriar/A
insosolar/A
inŧitar/A
tranxíɉer/A
ɉelar/A
ɉoŧolar/A
inkaecar/A
kalafatar/A
inkalmar/A
kaluñar/A
kontrakanbiar/A
skanpar/A
kañar/A
kapocar/A
inkarbonir/A
skarnevalar/A
kartiđar/A
kastigar/A
inkatiɉar/A
kauteriđar/A
skaveŧar/A
koar/A
deskoɉonar/A
kolmar/A
skomenŧar/A
koncar/A
konpanegar/A
kontaminar/A
skonŧar/A
inkórer/A
rekordar/A
skoroŧar/A
inkotir/A
rekòxer/A
skreventar/A
krostar/A
kuacar/A
skuercar/A
interkuirar/A
kuñar/A
kuŧar/A
langorir/A
lardar/A
laurear/A
delegar/A
leterar/A
ekuilibrar/A
limitar/A
xlofar/A
dexlontanar/A
iluminar/A
macar/A
makar/A
mandar/A
manipolar/A
maraveɉar/A
martelar/A
dexmaskarar/A
matriđar/A
medegar/A
menar/A
xmenuir/A
méter/A
skométer/A
dexminconar/A
mobiliar/A
xmolar/A
dexmontar/A
inmorbar/A
mormolar/A
mòver/A
mufar/A
inmusar/A
muxonar/A
nauxear/A
dexnetar/A
nolar/A
nudrir/A
xñokolar/A
okar/A
abondar/A
dexorbar/A
ornar/A
manovrar/A
padroniđar/A
palar/A
spalpeđar/A
despanocar/A
parir/A
despaređar/A
partikolariđar/A
pasiđar/A
patinar/A
spavejar/A
rapegar/A
spelukar/A
respénđer/A
pentir/A
peritar/A
inpestar/A
spetolar/A
pexar/A
pianiđar/A
apikar/A
pionar/A
pironar/A
spiŧar/A
replikar/A
inpolverar/A
konpóner/A
ponsar/A
spontonar/A
soportar/A
inpotar/A
predegar/A
despreŧar/A
procesar/A
publegar/A
desputar/A
rabotar/A
skoraɉar/A
ranđar/A
rausir/A
regaliđar/A
retribuir/A
riscar/A
rodar/A
irokir/A
interónper/A
dexroveɉar/A
ruinar/A
saer/A
sakosar/A
salpar/A
insanguenar/A
saver/A
scopar/A
sekolariđar/A
persèguer/A
konseɉar/A
insensar/A
inseñorar/A
sestar/A
siar/A
simentar/A
sistemar/A
skandaliđar/A
inskarselar/A
skicar/A
skorŧar/A
soraskríver/A
insokar/A
solkar/A
sopir/A
sovenŧionar/A
inspaxemar/A
insperonar/A
spigolar/A
splénder/A
sprotonar/A
stafar/A
stanpar/A
instekir/A
stirpar/A
stokar/A
stralar/A
striar/A
ostruir/A
studar/A
sublimar/A
suparar/A
tabakar/A
tajuŧar/A
tanaɉar/A
tardar/A
tastar/A
intecar/A
sorinténder/A
stenprar/A
asteñir/A
kontèñer/A
sostéñer/A
terŧariolar/A
intimorir/A
tiviar/A
tondar/A
intorcar/A
intòrđer/A
destràer/A
tragar/A
trasinar/A
intravaɉar/A
intreŧar/A
intristir/A
introxar/A
stusegar/A
ŧavatar/A
inŧénder/A
ŧerpir/A
ŧigalar/A
inŧipriar/A
inŧotar/A
uñolar/A
vadañar/A
xvanir/A
varentar/A
revéder/A
invelenir/A
ventiđar/A
reveñir/A
revèñer/A
vergoñar/A
vertir/A
reinvestir/A
videgar/A
viscar/A
vixionar/A
voler/A
volturar/A
inxakolar/A
xbarlar/A
xèmer/A
dexiderar/A
xmeriliar/A
xufolar/A
